src/pron-udm-lex.txt
LEXICON PRONOUN 

PERSONAL ;
DEMONSTRATIVE ;
REFLEXIVE ;

LEXICON PERSONAL

мон+ProN+Pers:мон PPRONSG-NCAIA ;
тон+ProN+Pers:тон PPRONSG-NCAIA ;
со+ProN+Pers:со PPRONSG-NCAIA ;
ми+ProN+Pers+Pl:ми PPRONPL ;
тӥ+ProN+Pers+Pl:тӥ PPRONPL ;
соос+ProN+Pers+Pl:соос PPRONPL ;

мон+ProN+Pers+Sg+Gen:мынам K ;
тон+ProN+Pers+Sg+Gen:тынад K ;
со+ProN+Pers+Sg+Gen:солэн K ;

мон+ProN+Pers+Sg+Abl:мынэсьтым K ;
тон+ProN+Pers+Sg+Abl:тынэсьтыд K ;
со+ProN+Pers+Sg+Abl:солэсь K ;

мон+ProN+Pers+Sg+Dat:мыным K ;
тон+ProN+Pers+Sg+Dat:тыныд K ;
со+ProN+Pers+Sg+Dat:солы K ;

LEXICON PPRONSG-NCAIA
+Acc:е K ;
+Car:тек K ;
+Advc:йа K ;
+Ins:ен K ;
+Ins:еным K ;
+Appr:лань K ;

LEXICON PPRONPL
+Nom: K ;
+Gen: K ;
+Acc: K ;
+Dat: K ;
+Abl: K ;


LEXICON DEMONSTRATIVE
та+ProN+Dem:т K ;
таӵе+ProN+Dem:таӵе K ;
тамында+ProN+Dem:тамында K ;
со+ProN+Dem:со K ;
сыӵе+ProN+Dem:сыӵе K ;
сомында+ProN+Dem:сомында K ;

LEXICON REFLEXIVE
K ;
